Hawaii statutes.
§328-94
Prescription record. Each pharmacist or
practitioner shall maintain a record of any substitution of an equivalent
generic drug product or an interchangeable biological product for a prescribed
brand name drug product as provided in this part. [L 1980, c 187, pt of
§1; am L 1996, c 209, §5; am L 2003, c 56, §7; am L 2016, c 242, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next